Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1709
Employer or other payor, defined.

Employer or other payor shall mean any person, partnership, limited liability company, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision, or department or agency of the state or federal government in possession of income and shall include an obligor if he or she is self-employed.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 29;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 22;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 217.